Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 7. Benefits.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan, see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 39.35.370.
Retirement benefits.

Subject to AS

39.35.450

, a terminated employee is eligible for a normal retirement benefit

at age 60 with at least five years credited service;

with at least 20 years of credited service as a peace officer or firefighter; or

with at least 30 years of credited service for all other employees.

Subject to AS

39.35.450

, a terminated employee is eligible for an early retirement benefit at age 55 with at least five years credited service. An actuarial adjustment shall be made to retirement benefits paid under this section for an early retirement benefit. The monthly amount of a retirement benefit that would be due under (c) of this section shall be reduced by multiplying one-half of one percent times the number of months, to the nearest month, by which the retirement date of the employee falls short of the date that the employee reaches age 60.

The monthly amount of a retirement benefit for a peace officer or firefighter is two percent of the average monthly compensation times the years of credited service through 10 years, plus two and one-half percent of the average monthly compensation times the years of service over 10 years. For all other employees it is

two percent of the average monthly compensation times all years of service before July 1, 1986, and for years of service through a total of 10 years; plus

two and one-quarter percent of the average monthly compensation times all years of service after June 30, 1986, over 10 years of total service through 20 years; plus

two and one-half percent of the average monthly compensation times all years of service after June 30, 1986, over 20 years of total service.

The monthly amount of a retirement benefit for a deferred vested member shall be determined in accordance with (c) of this section as it was in effect on the date of the employee’s termination of employment.

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month after which all of the following requirements are met: (1) the member meets the eligibility requirements of this section; (2) the member terminates employment; and (3) the member applies for retirement. The benefits are payable the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment shall be made for the month in which a benefit is payable under this section.

A member who is vested in the plan as a peace officer or firefighter at the time the member incurs a permanent disability of at least 33 1/3 percent under workers’ compensation and who (1) undergoes retraining because of the disability; and (2) is subsequently employed with the state or other employer in a position other than peace officer or firefighter, is eligible for a normal retirement benefit as a peace officer or firefighter under (a) and (c) of this section upon completing 20 years of credited service.

When an employee who was employed as a dispatcher in a state trooper office or in a police or fire department in the plan applies for appointment to retirement, the employee may convert the credited service for that position to credited service as a peace officer by claiming the service as peace officer service. An employee who has converted credited service to peace officer service under this subsection shall be treated as a peace officer for purposes of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

. When the member claims this credited service as peace officer service, an indebtedness of the member to the plan shall be established. The indebtedness is equal to the full actuarial cost of the conversion of the credited service to treatment as peace officer service. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time the member is appointed to retirement shall require an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based upon the conversion of the credited service.

When an employee applies for appointment to retirement in the plan, the employee may convert the credited service to which this subsection applies to credited service as a peace officer by claiming the service as peace officer service. This subsection applies to credited service as an employee of a state correctional facility, other than as a correctional officer or correctional superintendent. This subsection also applies to credited service as an employee of the Department of Corrections in a management position in the division that has responsibility for institutions or the division that has responsibility for community corrections if the employee also has at least five years of credited service as a probation officer, correctional officer, assistant correctional superintendent, or correctional superintendent at a state correctional facility. An employee who has converted credited service to peace officer service under this subsection shall be treated as a peace officer for purposes of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

. When the member claims this credited service as peace officer service, an indebtedness of the member to the plan shall be established. The indebtedness is equal to the full actuarial cost of the conversion of the credited service to treatment as peace officer service. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time the member is appointed to retirement will require an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based upon the conversion of the credited service. In this subsection,

“correctional facility” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

; and

“management position” includes positions as division director, deputy director, and assistant director.

For plan fiscal years beginning after December 31, 1975, and notwithstanding any other provision of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, the projected annual benefit provided by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

and the benefit from all other defined benefit plans required to be aggregated with the benefits from this plan under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 415 may not increase to an amount in excess of the amount permitted under 26 U.S.C. 415 at any time. In the event that any projected annual benefit of a member exceeds the limitation of 26 U.S.C. 415(g) for a limitation year, the plan shall take any necessary remedial action to correct an excess accrued annual benefit. The provisions of 26 U.S.C. 415, and the regulations adopted under that statute, as applied to qualified defined benefit plans of governmental employers are incorporated as part of the terms and conditions of the plan. This subsection applies to any member of this plan.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section,

for the plan fiscal years beginning on or after January 1, 1996, the annual compensation of a member who joined the plan after the first day of the first plan fiscal year beginning after December 31, 1995, that is used to calculate the member’s average monthly compensation may not exceed $150,000, as adjusted for the cost of living in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17)(B);

for the plan fiscal years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, the annual compensation limitation for such a member, which is so taken into account for such a member which is so taken into account for such purposes, may not exceed $200,000, as adjusted for the cost of living in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17)(B);

the cost-of-living adjustment in effect for a calendar year applies in this subsection to a determination period beginning in the calendar year.

[Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

History.

(§ 18 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 1963; am § 7 ch 155 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 235 SLA 1968; am § 6 ch 109 SLA 1970; am §§ 6, 7 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 15 ch 47 SLA 1974; am § 34 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 33 ch 146 SLA 1980; am §§ 22 — 24 ch 82 SLA 1986; am §§ 34, 35 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 121 SLA 2000; am § 36 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 26 ch 92 SLA 2004; am § 101 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “fire fighter” was substituted for “fireman” in this section under § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Subsection (h) was enacted as (g); relettered in 2000.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Cross references. —

For 1980 adjustment to pensions of retirees who were disabled at the time of retirement, see § 49, ch. 146, SLA 1980 in the Temporary and Special Acts and Resolves; for 1986 increase in retirement benefits for certain employees of the Territory of Alaska, see § 54, ch. 82, SLA 1986 in the Temporary and Special Acts and Resolves.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Section 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 provides:
“Sections 16, 22-23, 25-27, 42-45, and 50 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986.”

Section 44, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 provides that nothing in that Act, which amended subsection (b), “modifies or terminates the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 1996.” Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that Act, which amended subsection (b), are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 39.35.371.
Distribution requirements.

The entire interest of a member must be distributed or must begin to be distributed not later than the member’s required beginning date.

If a member dies after the distribution of the member’s interest has begun but before the distribution has been completed, the remaining portion of the interest shall continue to be distributed at least as rapidly as under the method of distribution being used before the member’s death.

If a member has made a distribution election and dies before the distribution of the member’s interest begins, distribution of the member’s entire interest shall be completed by December 31 of the calendar year containing the fifth anniversary of the member’s death. However, if any portion of the member’s interest is payable to a designated beneficiary, distributions may be made over the life of the designated beneficiary or over a period not greater than the life expectancy of the designated beneficiary, commencing on or before December 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the member died, and if the designated beneficiary is the member’s surviving spouse, the date distributions are required to begin may not be earlier than the later of December 31 of the calendar year (1) immediately following the calendar year in which the member died, or (2) in which the member would have attained 70 1/2 years of age, whichever is earlier. If the surviving spouse dies after the member but before payments to the spouse have begun, the provisions of this subsection apply as if the surviving spouse were the member. An amount paid to a child of the member will be treated as if it were paid to the surviving spouse if the amount becomes payable to the surviving spouse when the child reaches the age of majority.

If a member has not made a distribution election before the member’s death, the member’s designated beneficiary must elect the method of distribution not later than December 31 of the calendar year (1) in which distributions would be required to begin under this section, or (2) that contains the fifth anniversary of the date of death of the member, whichever is earlier. If the member does not have a designated beneficiary or if the designated beneficiary does not elect a method of distribution, distribution of the member’s entire interest must be completed by December 31 of the calendar year containing the fifth anniversary of the member’s death.

For purposes of (c) of this section, distribution of a member’s interest is considered to begin (1) on the member’s required beginning date, or (2) if the designated beneficiary is the member’s surviving spouse and the surviving spouse dies after the member but before payments to the spouse have begun, on the date distribution is required to begin to the surviving spouse. If distribution in the form of an annuity irrevocably commences to the member before the required beginning date, the date distribution is considered to begin is the date that the distribution actually commences.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, the requirements of this section apply to all distributions of a member’s interest and take precedence over any inconsistent provisions of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

.

All distributions required under this section are determined and made in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations adopted under that statute, including any minimum distribution incidental benefit requirement.

Unless otherwise specified, the provisions of this section apply to calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 1983.

In this section,

“designated beneficiary” means the individual who is designated as the beneficiary under the plan in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations adopted under that statute;

“required beginning date” means the first day of April of the calendar year following the calendar year in which the member either attains 70 1/2 years of age or actually retires, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 37 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 27 ch 92 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.375.
Public service benefit.

An active or inactive member who has never been vested in this plan or in the teachers’ retirement plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, who has at least two years of credited service in this plan, and who has membership service in the teachers’ retirement system may claim credited service in this plan in an amount equal to the membership service the member has in the teachers’ retirement system. The claimed credited service may be added to service earned under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

to enable the member to qualify for a public service benefit under this section. The member may not claim credited service for membership service for which the member has received a refund under AS

14.25.150

. The member may not claim credited service in this plan based on unused sick leave under AS

14.25.115

.

To claim credited service under this section, the member shall file a written request with the administrator when the member applies to retire. The administrator shall determine the full actuarial cost of benefits based on the member’s total credited service and shall transfer from the teachers’ retirement system to this plan an amount equal to the sum of the member contributions and any indebtedness payments to the teachers’ retirement system and the employer contributions to the teachers’ retirement system made on behalf of the employee together with interest earned on those contributions and indebtedness payments. If the amount to be transferred, when combined with the amount of employee contributions and indebtedness payments to this plan and the amount of employer contributions on behalf of the employee in this plan, and interest earned on contributions and indebtedness payments for the employee, is less than the full actuarial cost computed under this subsection, an indebtedness to the plan equal to the amount of the difference is established. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on the indebtedness. The member must pay any outstanding indebtedness existing at the time the member applies for retirement in full before the member is appointed to retirement under this section.

A member is entitled to receive a public service benefit under this section if the member has at least a total of five years credited service under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

and credited service from the teachers’ retirement plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

claimed under this section. A public service benefit shall be calculated using the higher of the average monthly compensation for service in this plan or the average base salary for service in the teachers’ retirement plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

. The amount of the benefit shall be calculated in accordance with AS

39.35.370(c)

.

Credited service earned under either this plan or the teachers’ retirement system that has been claimed for a public service benefit under this section may not be used for any other purpose. A member who claims credited service under this section loses all rights to benefits under AS 14.25 based on the claimed credited service. A member may not claim credited service under this section unless the member claims all of the membership service the member has in the teachers’ retirement system. A public service benefit does not constitute a normal or early retirement benefit for purposes of qualifying for a conditional service retirement benefit under AS

14.25.125

or AS

39.35.385

.

A member whose rights to benefits under AS 14.25 are subject to a qualified domestic relations order may claim credited service under this section. However, the credited service claimed remains subject to the terms of the order.

[Repealed, § 116(b) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

If a member retires under this section and subsequently returns to work for an employer under this plan or the teachers’ retirement system, benefits under this section shall cease during the period of reemployment and shall recommence when the reemployment is ended. The credited service earned during the period of reemployment may not be added to the credited service claimed for a public service benefit under this section. If a member vests and meets the other eligibility requirements under this system or the teachers’ retirement system during the reemployment, the member is entitled to a benefit under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

or AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, as appropriate.

In this section,

“membership service earned under AS 14.25” means membership service earned under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

;

“teachers’ retirement system” and “teachers’ retirement system under AS 14.25” mean the teachers’ retirement plan established in AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 109 SLA 2000; am §§ 102 — 109 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 68, 116(b) ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Sec. 39.35.380.
Early retirement benefits. [Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 39.35.381.
Alternate benefit for elected public officers.

An elected public officer is eligible for a public officer benefit if the officer is retired under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

. Only fully paid credited service as an elected public officer of a municipality or other political subdivision, earned while the municipality or political subdivision was an employer under this plan and while the person was employed full-time under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

, may be counted under this section.

Credited service for which contributions were refunded is not creditable under this section unless the refunded contributions have been repaid. For purposes of (a) of this section, a member or former member does not have to be reemployed under this plan in order to pay refunded contributions. Compound interest at the rate prescribed by regulation shall be added to the reinstatement indebtedness from the date of the refund to the date of repayment.

The amount of the monthly elected public officer benefit is two percent of the average monthly compensation for service eligible under this section times those years of service.

When an elected public officer eligible to receive credited service under this section dies, the officer’s designated beneficiary is entitled to the balance in the officer’s employee contribution account.

A person who retires under this section is not entitled to disability or death benefits under AS

39.35.400

—

39.35.440

, a minimum benefit under AS

39.35.485

, or to medical benefits under AS

39.35.535

. Service earned under this section may not be used for vesting under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

.

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month after which all of the following requirements are met: (1) the elected public officer meets the eligibility requirements of this section; (2) the officer terminates employment under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

; and (3) the officer applies for retirement. The benefits are payable the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of the delay.

An elected public officer may claim credit under this section for service performed as an elected public officer before May 31, 1989. To claim the service, the elected public officer must have been an elected public officer of a municipality or political subdivision that was an employer under this plan during the elected service and must have been employed full-time under AS 14.25 during that time. When the elected public officer claims that service, an indebtedness to the plan is established. The amount of the indebtedness is the full actuarial cost of providing benefits for the service claimed. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on that indebtedness beginning on July 1, 1989. Any outstanding indebtedness existing at the time the person retires requires an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based on that service.

History.

(§ 3 ch 58 SLA 1989; am § 110 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.385.
Conditional service retirement benefits.

Subject to AS

39.35.450

, an employee is eligible for a normal retirement benefit at age 60 with at least two years of credited service if the employee also is eligible for a normal retirement salary under AS 14.25 (teachers’ retirement system).

Subject to AS

39.35.450

, an employee is eligible for an early retirement benefit at age 55 with at least two years of credited service if the employee also is eligible for an early retirement salary under AS 14.25 (teachers’ retirement system).

Credited service for which contributions were refunded is not creditable under this section.

The monthly amount of a conditional service retirement benefit shall be calculated on the years of fully paid credited service in accordance with AS

39.35.370(c)

, except that the member may irrevocably elect to substitute one-twelfth of the “average base salary” as defined in AS

14.25.220

(5) in place of average monthly compensation.

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month (1) in which the member meets the eligibility requirements of this section, (2) following the date of termination, and (3) following application for retirement, and are payable the last day of the month. If payment is delayed, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment shall be made for the month in which the member dies or is no longer eligible for a benefit under this section.

Subject to AS

39.35.450

, an employee is eligible for a normal retirement benefit at age 60 or an early retirement benefit at age 55 if the employee was first hired as a legislative employee before May 30, 1987, and has at least 60 days of credited service as an employee of the legislature, other than as an employee of the Office of the Ombudsman or the office of victims’ rights, during each of five legislative sessions. An employee who was first hired as a legislative employee on or after May 30, 1987, and is otherwise eligible under this subsection must have at least 80 days of credited service during each of five legislative sessions to receive benefits under this subsection.

History.

(§ 3 ch 174 SLA 1978; am § 11 ch 82 SLA 1979; am § 37 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 50, 51 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 25 — 27 ch 82 SLA 1986; am §§ 36, 37 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 21 SLA 1987; am § 23 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 69 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1986, the phrase “Subject to AS

39.35.450

” was added at the beginning of (f) of this section in order to be consistent with (a) and (b) of this section and the language of AS

39.35.450

, as amended by ch. 117, SLA 1986.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in (c) of this section.

Cross references. —

For applicability of (f) of this section to certain persons not employed under the public employee’s retirement system on July 1, 1979, see § 15, ch. 82, SLA 1979 in the Temporary and Special Acts and Resolves.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system.

Hammond v. Hoffbeck

, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of a particular statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Section 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 provides:
“Sections 16, 22-23, 25-27, 42-45, and 50 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986.”

Sec. 39.35.389.
Alternate benefits for EPORS members.

Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.050, a former member of the Alaska Territorial Legislature who is receiving a benefit on June 5, 1989 under the Elected Public Officers Retirement System and who has at least 30 years of credited service in the territorial and state legislatures may elect a benefit under this subsection instead of the benefit under former AS 39.37.050. The monthly amount of a benefit under this subsection is the greater of the member’s years of credited service multiplied by

the member’s average monthly compensation and that amount multiplied by two percent; or

$100.

Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.060, a surviving spouse receiving a benefit under the Elected Public Officers Retirement System whose spouse met the requirements of (a) of this section at the time of the spouse’s death may elect a benefit under this subsection instead of the benefit under former AS 39.37.060. The amount of a benefit under this subsection is 50 percent of the amount calculated for the deceased spouse under (a) of this section.

Benefits payable under this section accrue from the first day of the month following receipt of an application for benefits under this section and are payable on the last day of the month.

History.

(§ 29 ch 106 SLA 1988)

Sec. 39.35.390.
Deferred retirement benefit. [Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 39.35.395.
Voluntary contribution benefit.

The balance of the employee’s savings account shall be paid in one of the following options as elected by the employee:

a lump sum payment; or

a life annuity on a full cash refund or term-certain basis; or

installments over a designated period of time.

History.

(§ 35 ch 128 SLA 1977)

Sec. 39.35.400.
Nonoccupational disability benefits.

An employee is eligible for a nonoccupational disability benefit if the employee’s employment is terminated because of a total and apparently permanent nonoccupational disability, as defined in AS

39.35.680

, before the employee’s normal retirement date and after five or more years of credited service. A member is not entitled to a nonoccupational disability benefit under this section unless the member files an application for the benefit with the administrator within 90 days after the member terminated employment. The board may waive a filing deadline if there are extraordinary circumstances that resulted in the inability to meet the deadline. The board may delegate the authority to waive a filing deadline under this subsection to the administrator.

The nonoccupational disability benefits accrue beginning the first day of the month following termination of employment as a result of the disability and are payable the last day of the month. If a final determination granting the benefit is not made in time to pay the benefit when due, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment shall be for the first month in which the disabled employee

dies;

recovers from disability;

fails to meet the requirements under (e) of this section or under AS

39.35.415

; or

reaches normal retirement age.

If the disabled employee becomes ineligible to receive nonoccupational disability benefits, the employee is entitled to receive a normal or early retirement benefit if the employee would have been eligible for the benefit had employment continued during the period of disability. However, the period of disability does not constitute credited service.

The monthly amount of the nonoccupational disability benefit shall be determined in accordance with AS

39.35.370(c)

, considering the employee’s credited service and compensation before termination of employment.

A disabled employee receiving a nonoccupational disability benefit shall provide the administrator, one year after appointment to disability benefits and once each year thereafter until disability benefits cease, proof of continuing eligibility to receive disability payments under the Social Security Act. If the disabled employee is otherwise ineligible for a social security payment, the employee shall provide the administrator with sufficient medical evidence once each year to demonstrate that disability payments under the Social Security Act would be payable had the employee been otherwise eligible. If the disabled employee fails to provide the administrator with evidence of continuing eligibility for disability payments under the Social Security Act or other medical evidence required by the administrator within 30 days following each anniversary date, the disability benefits from the plan shall cease. If that information is subsequently provided to the administrator, benefit payments will resume beginning for the month following that in which the information is provided. When disability payments under the Social Security Act cease, it is the responsibility of the disabled employee to notify the administrator immediately.

A disabled employee’s nonoccupational disability benefit terminates when the employee first attains eligibility for normal retirement. At that time, retirement benefits will be calculated under AS

39.35.370(c)

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 9 ch 155 SLA 1966; am §§ 9, 10 ch 109 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 159 SLA 1972; am §§ 15 — 17 ch 1 SLA 1974; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 123 SLA 1976; am §§ 36, 37 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 28 — 32 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 41 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system.

Hammond v. Hoffbeck

, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Sec. 39.35.410.
Occupational disability benefits.

An employee is eligible for an occupational disability benefit if employment is terminated because of a total and apparently permanent occupational disability, as defined in AS

39.35.680

, before the employee’s normal retirement date.

The occupational disability benefits accrue beginning the first day of the month following termination of employment as a result of the disability and are payable the last day of the month. If a final determination granting the benefit is not made in time to pay the benefit when due, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment shall be for the first month in which the disabled employee

dies;

recovers from disability;

fails to meet the requirements under (g) of this section or under AS

39.35.415

; or

reaches normal retirement age.

If the disabled employee becomes ineligible to receive occupational disability benefits before the normal retirement date, the disabled employee shall then be entitled to receive an early retirement benefit if the employee would have been eligible for the benefit had employment continued during the period of disability. The period of disability constitutes credited service.

The monthly amount of an occupational disability benefit is 40 percent of the disabled employee’s gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 123 SLA 1976.]

An employee is not entitled to an occupational disability benefit unless the employee files an application for it with the administrator within 90 days of the date of terminating employment. If the employee is unable to meet a filing requirement of this subsection, it may be waived by the commissioner if there are extraordinary circumstances that resulted in the employee’s inability to meet the filing requirement.

A disabled employee receiving an occupational disability benefit shall undergo a medical examination as often as the administrator considers advisable but not more frequently than once each year. The administrator shall determine the place of the examination and engage the physician or physicians. If, in the judgment of the administrator, the examination indicates that the retired employee is no longer incapacitated because of a total and apparently permanent occupational disability, the administrator may not issue further disability benefits to the employee.

A disabled employee’s occupational disability benefit terminates when the disabled employee first attains eligibility for normal retirement. At that time, the employee’s retirement benefit shall be calculated under the provisions of AS

39.35.370(c)

.

Notwithstanding (h) of this section, at the time a peace officer or firefighter receiving occupational disability benefits under this section first attains eligibility for normal retirement, the employee shall irrevocably elect to receive retirement benefits in the amount calculated as the

monthly occupational disability benefit calculated under (d) of this section; or

employee’s retirement benefit calculated under the provisions of AS

39.35.370(c)

.

Notwithstanding (b)(3) of this section, a peace officer or firefighter who retires under (i) of this section is not subject to the requirements of (g) of this section or AS

39.35.415

during retirement.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 109 SLA 1970; am §§ 18 — 21 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 13 ch 205 SLA 1975; am §§ 9 — 13 ch 123 SLA 1976; am §§ 38, 39 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 38 ch 13 SLA 1980; am §§ 33 — 39 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 42 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 38 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 111 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the public employees’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of the statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

Chapter 205, SLA 1975, which amended this section, was submitted to the voters by referendum and was rejected.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Benefits paid under subsection (i) of this section are retirement benefits, and not disability benefits. Sept. 19, 2002, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.35.415.
Reemployment of disabled employees.

An employee appointed to disability benefits under AS

39.35.400

or

39.35.410

shall apply to the division of vocational rehabilitation within 30 days of the date disability benefits commence.
The employee shall be enrolled in a rehabilitation program if the employee meets the eligibility requirements of the division of vocational rehabilitation.
Unless the employee demonstrates cause, benefits shall terminate at the end of the first month in which a disabled employee

fails to report to the division of vocational rehabilitation;

is certified by the division of vocational rehabilitation as failing to cooperate in a vocational rehabilitation program;

fails to interview for a job; or

fails to accept a position offered.

History.

(§ 40 ch 82 SLA 1986)